Washington statutes.
RCW 41.28.205

Benefits payable in accordance with court decree or order of dissolution or legal separation.

Benefits under this chapter shall be payable to a spouse or ex-spouse to the extent expressly provided for in any court decree of dissolution or legal separation or in any court order or court-approved property settlement agreement incident to any court decree of dissolution or legal separation.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 205 s 9.]